Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 5

Museums

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 561, § 13: Apr. 18, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that the Sixty-seventh General Assembly has, by a vote of two-thirds of the members elected to both Houses, voted to extend the regular session of the Sixty-seventh General Assembly, as authorized in the Constitution; that under the provisions of Amendment 7 to the Constitution, enactments of the General Assembly that do not have an emergency clause do not become effective until ninety (90) days after the date of final adjournment of the General Assembly; that the extended session of the General Assembly may not adjourn in time for this act to take effect prior to July 1, 1969, thereby depriving the agency for which funds are appropriated herein of necessary operating funds to commence the next fiscal biennium; and in order that the appropriation made herein may be available on July 1, 1969, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this act is necessary for the maintenance and operation of the essential governmental services. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval, provided that the appropriation authorized herein shall not be available until July 1, 1969.”

13-5-101. Loan of museum objects.

All state agencies and institutions possessing museum objects in excess of their own needs for display, education, or research are authorized and urged to make those objects available on a loan basis to state-financed museums in this state in order that the residents of this state may receive maximum enjoyment and education from the objects.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 561, § 9.

Subchapter 2

— Museum Services

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2011, No. 679, § 2, provided:

“GRANT ELIGIBILITY. To be eligible for a grant under this act, an entity must establish that it is a nonprofit non-governmental 501(c)(3) organization with a mission to form a national center of heritage and legacy within the State of Arkansas dedicated to United States Marshals.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2011 through June 30, 2012.”

Acts 2011, No. 679, § 3, provided:

“FINDINGS, PURPOSE, AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

The United States Marshals have played a significant role in the settlement of the State of Arkansas and the United States;

“(2)

The United States Marshals Service, established on September 24, 1789, as part of the Judiciary Act that was the first bill passed in Congress and signed into law by George Washington, is the oldest federal law enforcement agency in the nation;

“(3)

Although originally established to protect the judiciary, the United States Marshals were often called the other duties as assigned agency because of their broad powers as evidenced by their call in 1794 to protect tax collectors during the Whiskey Rebellion and responsibility for enforcing the Fugitive Slave Act in 1850;

“(4)

Today, there are 94 United States Marshals, one for each federal district, who continue to be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the President of the United States, and numerous Deputy Marshals responsible for carrying out the day-to-day duties of the United States Marshals Service as civil servants;

“(5)

Because of the over two hundred (200) year honorable history of the United States Marshals Service, the cultural and economic development of this state would benefit by the construction, operation, and maintenance of a museum honoring the United States Marshals Service; and

“(6)

Since there currently is not a museum in the country honoring the United States Marshals Service, having the only museum dedicated to the oldest federal law enforcement agency in the nation would bring national and regional attention to the state, increase tourism, create jobs, promote economic and cultural development, and promote the planning and development of infrastructure and resources to support the increased activity, all of which would have a substantial positive impact on the state as a whole.

“(b)

The General Assembly further finds and determines that:

“(1)

The construction, development, and maintenance of museums devoted to honoring the historical significance of the United States Marshals Service are noble, public purposes that will provide educational opportunities for all citizens in the State of Arkansas, promote industry and tourism, and provide economic development to cities and towns within the state;

“(2)

Any funds obtained from a state or local government, a public, private, or nonprofit entity, or an individual intended to assist in the construction, development, or maintenance of a United States Marshals museum or exhibit would inure to the benefit of the people of this State by defraying development and operational costs and expenses; and

“(3)

All funding provided for the construction, development, or maintenance of a United States Marshals museum or exhibit is found to be for a public purpose benefitting the public good and that any funds given, allocated, or loaned to a United States Marshals museum or exhibit by any state or local government is conclusively presumed to be for public uses and purposes.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2011 through June 30, 2012.”

Preambles.

Acts 1979, No. 832 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, museums preserve our heritage for the benefit, enjoyment, and education of the citizens of all ages and from every community in Arkansas; and

“Whereas, museums are unique cultural resources through the preservation, exhibition, and documentation of historically, scientifically, and artistically significant facts and artifacts; and

“Whereas, museums provide a unique educational tool which can directly supplement the state's educational system through demonstrating the use and significance of said artifacts;

“Now therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1979, No. 832, § 15: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is an immediate need to establish Arkansas Museum Services and transfer the Des Arc Archeological Center, the Museum and Cultural Commission and the Arkansas Oil Museum to the Museum Services Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism so as to ensure the preservation of, the state's heritage and to assist, promote, and advance the purposes of the museums throughout Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-5-201. Definition.

As used in this subchapter, “museum” means an organized and permanent nonprofit institution with professional staff, essentially educational or aesthetic in purpose, which owns and utilizes tangible objects of service, history, art, or culture, cares for them, and exhibits them to the public on some regular schedule.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 832, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-907.7.

13-5-202 — 13-5-205. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning the Museum Services Division, the Division's functions, the Division's director, and the acceptance of grants and donations, were repealed by Acts 2001, No. 802, § 1. The sections were derived from the following sources:

13-5-202. Acts 1979, No. 832, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-907.6.

13-5-203. Acts 1979, No. 832, § § 2,4; 1983, No. 758, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § § 5-907.7, 5-907.9.

13-5-204. Acts 1979, No. 832, § 4; 1983, No. 758, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-907.9.

13-5-205. Acts 1979, No. 832, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-907.11.

13-5-206. Program of grants-in-aid and technical assistance.

(a)

The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism shall establish and carry out a program of grants-in-aid to eligible museums or, in appropriate cases, organizations engaged in or concerned with history, science, art, or culture on the basis of fifty percent (50%) state grant funds and fifty percent (50%) of the funds to be provided by the museum, as follows:

(1)

Only museums and programs concerned with historical, scientific, cultural, or artistically oriented programs offering nonprofit services to the general public may make application for and qualify for funds under this subchapter;

(2)

None of the funds received by a museum or other organization which qualifies or utilizes funds under this subchapter shall be used as matching funds for other state funds; and

(3)

All requests for state grant funds under this subchapter shall be prepared on forms promulgated or approved by the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism and shall be in compliance with the provisions of this subchapter and with reasonable rules to be promulgated by the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism for the administration of this subchapter.

(b)

The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism shall provide technical assistance and information to all museums and museum personnel in Arkansas, within the limitations of available staff and funding.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 832, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-907.8; Acts 2001, No. 802, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5561.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 802, § 12, provided:

“All powers, duties, and functions of the Museum Services Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism are hereby transferred to the State Parks Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism.”

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment inserted “and technical assistance” in the section heading; in (a), substituted “State Parks Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism” for “Arkansas Museum Services Division”, and deleted a comma following “culture”; and added (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “State Parks Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “division” twice in (a)(3) and in (b).

13-5-207. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the Arkansas Museum Review Panel, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5562, effective July 1, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1979, No. 832, § 5; 1983, No. 758, § 2; 1985, No. 944, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-907.10; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 77; 2001, No. 802, § 3.

Subchapter 3

— Arkansas Museum and Cultural Center Act

Publisher's Notes.

The Arkansas Museum and Cultural Commission created under §13-5-303 was abolished by Acts 1991, No. 343, § 3.

Preambles.

Acts 1979, No. 832 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, museums preserve our heritage for the benefit, enjoyment, and education of the citizens of all ages and from every community in Arkansas; and

“Whereas, museums are unique cultural resources through the preservation, exhibition, and documentation of historically, scientifically, and artistically significant facts and artifacts; and

“Whereas, museums provide a unique educational tool which can directly supplement the state's educational system through demonstrating the use and significance of said artifacts;

“Now therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1018, § 3: Jan. 27, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the securing of bonds issued by the Museum and Cultural Commission by a partial pledge of interest earnings derived from investment of idle State Treasury funds is necessary to ensure continued progress in promoting cultural activities for the citizens of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 832, § 15: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is an immediate need to establish Arkansas Museum Services and transfer the Des Arc Archeological Center, the Museum and Cultural Commission and the Arkansas Oil Museum to the Museum Services Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism so as to ensure the preservation of, the state's heritage and to assist, promote, and advance the purposes of the museums throughout Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from July 1, 1979.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-5-301. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Arkansas Museum and Cultural Center Act”.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1201.

13-5-302. Construction of subchapter.

This subchapter shall be construed liberally. The enumeration of any object, purpose, power, manner, method, and thing shall not be deemed to exclude like or similar objects, purposes, powers, manners, methods, and things.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1212.

13-5-303 — 13-5-306. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 343, § 3, provided, in part, that “the Arkansas Museum and Cultural Commission created under Arkansas Code §13-5-303 is abolished.”

These sections, concerning the Arkansas Museum and Cultural Commission, were repealed by Acts 1991, No. 343, § 3. They were derived from the following sources:

13-5-303. Acts 1971, No. 515, §§ 1, 2; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1035, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 6-616, 6-1202, 6-1203; reen. Acts 1987, No. 862, § 1.

13-5-304. Acts 1971, No. 515, § 3; 1979, No. 832, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1204.

13-5-305. Acts 1971, No. 515, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1205.

13-5-306. Acts 1971, No. 515, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1205.

13-5-307. Funds for museum and cultural center — Issuance of bonds.

(a)(1)

The Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism is authorized to use any available funds for the construction, equipment, and operation of a museum and cultural center.

(2)

The secretary is authorized to issue revenue bonds, secured by and payable from the revenues specified in this subchapter, and to use the proceeds of the bonds for the acquisition, construction, and equipment of the center.

(b)

The principal amount of bonds to be issued by the secretary shall be sufficient, together with any available funds, to pay the cost of accomplishing the specified purposes, the costs of authorizing and issuing bonds, the amounts necessary for reserves if deemed desirable by the secretary, the amounts necessary for interest during and for up to one (1) year after construction, and all other costs of whatever nature incidental to the accomplishment of the center, but in no event shall the aggregate principal amount of bonds exceed twelve million dollars ($12,000,000).

(c)(1)

No bonds shall be issued under the provisions of this subchapter unless and until the secretary, or a department, or educational or other institution, or agency of the State of Arkansas has entered into a signed agreement with the Smithsonian Institution, an agency thereof, or organization affiliated therewith, which agreement shall provide that the Smithsonian Institution, the agency, or organization shall involve itself with the Arkansas Museum and Cultural Center and its operation.

(2)

The agreement must first be approved in writing by the Governor of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, §§ 5, 9; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1018, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 6-1206, 6-1209; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5563.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a)(1); and substituted “secretary” for “director” throughout the section.

13-5-308. Authorizing resolutions.

(a)

Bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.

(b)

The authorizing resolution may contain or may provide for the execution of a trust indenture which may contain any other terms, covenants, and conditions that are deemed desirable by the secretary, including, without limitation, those pertaining to:

(1)

The maintenance of various funds and reserves;

(2)

The nature and extent of revenue pledges and security;

(3)

The conditions precedent to the issuance of additional bonds and the priority of lien and pledge in that event;

(4)

The custody and application of the proceeds of the bonds;

(5)

The collection and disposition of revenues;

(6)

The investing and reinvesting in securities specified by the secretary of any moneys during periods not needed for authorized purposes; and

(7)

The rights, duties, and obligations of the secretary and of the holders and registered owners of the bonds.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, § 5; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1018, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1206; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 5564, 5565.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” in (a); and inserted “or secretary” in the introductory language of (b).

13-5-309. Terms and characteristics of bonds.

(a)

As the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism shall determine, bonds issued pursuant to this subchapter may:

(1)

Be coupon bonds, payable to bearer, or may be registrable as to principal only or as to principal and interest, and may be made exchangeable for bonds of another denomination;

(2)

Be in a form and denomination as the secretary determines;

(3)

Have such date or dates, may be stated to mature at such times, and bear interest payable at such times and at such rate or rates, as the secretary determines, provided that no bond may bear interest at a rate exceeding eight percent (8%) per annum;

(4)

Be made payable at places within or without the State of Arkansas;

(5)

Be made subject to terms of redemption in advance of maturity at such prices, as determined by the secretary;

(6)

Be issued in series from time to time; and

(7)

Contain such terms and conditions as the secretary determines.

(b)

Subject to provisions as to registration as set forth in subsection (a) of this section, the bonds shall have all the qualities of negotiable instruments under the laws of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, § 5; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1018, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1206; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5566.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “secretary” for “director” throughout (a).

13-5-310. Contract with bond owners — Enforcement.

(a)

Any authorizing resolution and trust indenture shall, together with this subchapter, constitute a contract between the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism and the holders and registered owners of the bonds.

(b)

This contract and all covenants, agreements, and obligations therein shall be promptly performed in strict compliance with the terms and provisions of the contract.

(c)

The covenants, agreements, and obligations of the secretary may be enforced by mandamus or other appropriate proceedings at law or in equity.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, § 5; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1018, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1206; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5567.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a).

13-5-311. Sale of bonds.

(a)

The bonds shall be sold at public sale on sealed bids after such advertisement as the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism shall determine to be necessary for the obtaining of favorable competitive bidding.

(b)

In no event shall any bid be accepted which results in a net interest cost, which is determined by computing the aggregate interest cost from date to maturity at the rates bid and deducting any premium or adding the amount of any discount, in excess of the interest cost computed at par for bonds bearing interest at the rate of eight percent (8%) per annum.

(c)

The bonds shall not be subject to conversion.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, § 5; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1018, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1206; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5568.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a).

13-5-312. Execution of bonds and coupons.

(a)

The bonds shall be executed by the manual or facsimile signature of the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism. The coupons attached to the bonds shall be executed by the facsimile signature of the secretary.

(b)

In case any of the officers whose signatures appear on the bonds or coupons shall cease to be officers before the delivery of the bonds or coupons, their signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes.

(c)

The secretary shall adopt and use a seal in the execution and issuance of the bonds. Each bond shall be sealed with the seal of the secretary.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, § 5; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1018, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1206; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 5569, 5570.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a); and substituted “secretary” for “director” twice in (c).

13-5-313. Statements on bonds — Liability.

(a)

It shall be plainly stated on the face of each bond that:

(1)

The bond has been issued under the provisions of this subchapter;

(2)

The bonds are obligations only of the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;

(3)

In no event do the bonds constitute an indebtedness for which the faith and credit of the State of Arkansas or any of its revenues are pledged; and

(4)

The bonds are not secured by a mortgage or lien on any land or buildings belonging to the State of Arkansas or the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.

(b)

No member of the department shall be personally liable on the bonds or for any damages sustained by anyone in connection with any contracts entered into in carrying out the purposes and intent of this subchapter unless he or she shall have acted with a corrupt intent.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, § 5; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1018, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1206; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 5571, 5572.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a)(2); and substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a)(4).

13-5-314. Disposition of revenues.

(a)

All revenues derived from the operation of the Arkansas Museum and Cultural Center and all other funds received by the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism from other sources for use in connection with the center and its operation are center revenues and are specifically declared to be cash funds, restricted in their use and to be used solely as provided in this subchapter.

(b)

These revenues shall not be deposited into the State Treasury but shall be deposited by the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism as and when received into a bank or banks as the secretary may from time to time select.

(c)(1)

Center revenues shall be applied annually in the following order:

(A)

To the extent necessary after taking into consideration any other funds which may be available for the purpose, for operation and maintenance expenses of the center; and

(B)

To the payment of the principal of, interest on, and trustee's and paying agent's fees in connection with bonds issued under this subchapter, and the establishing and maintaining of any debt service reserves.

(2)

Should there be any excess after subdivisions (c)(1)(A) and (B) of this section, the excess may be applied, as determined by the secretary, to the redemption of bonds prior to maturity or for the payment of any costs and expenses incurred by the secretary in the accomplishment of the powers and authorities conferred upon the secretary by §13-5-304 [repealed].

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, § 5; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1018, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1206; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5573.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a); and in (b), substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” and “secretary” for “director”.

13-5-315. Debt service — Pledge of revenues and earnings — Admission charges.

(a)

The payment of debt service, including principal, interest, and trustee's and paying agent's fees, shall be secured by a lien on and pledge of net center revenues, which are gross revenues less those revenues applied to operation and maintenance as set forth in §13-5-314.

(b)

As additional security, the payment of debt service may be secured by a pledge of earnings to the extent specified in this section derived from the investment of state funds pursuant to the State Treasury Management Law, §19-3-501 et seq., known as the “investment earnings”.

(c)

Any pledge of investment earnings shall be subordinate to pledges authorized by the Industrial Development Guaranty Bond Act, §15-4-701 et seq.

(d)

No earnings from the investment of state funds shall be pledged to secure bonds issued by the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism under this subchapter unless the secretary shall first enter into an agreement with the State Board of Finance to charge appropriate fees for admission to the Arkansas Museum and Cultural Center and to set aside in a special sinking fund, to be used exclusively to pay the principal of, interest on, and paying agent's fees in connection with, bonds issued by the secretary, at least seventy-five cents (75¢) of the admission fee collected for each adult and fifty cents (50¢) of the admission fee collected for each person six (6) years of age to seventeen (17) years of age, inclusive.

(e)

However, the secretary may waive all admission charges or establish special reduced admission charges for any school-sponsored student, students, or groups, in which cases the provisions of this section relating to the setting aside of a prescribed amount of each admission charge for payment of principal and interest on bonds shall not apply.

(f)

Notwithstanding the provisions of §13-5-314, the revenues required to be set aside into the special sinking fund shall not be deposited or used for any purpose other than for payment of principal, interest, and paying agent's fees on bonds issued under this subchapter.

(g)

All pledges of investment earnings under this subchapter shall not exceed in the aggregate five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for any fiscal year.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, § 5; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1018, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1206; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5574.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment, in (d), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism” and “secretary” for “director” twice.

Cross References.

State Board of Finance, §19-3-701 et seq.

13-5-316. Administration of debt-servicing provisions — Bond guaranty fund.

(a)

The Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism shall notify the State Board of Finance or the appropriate officer, board, or agency then having jurisdiction over the moneys involved when the secretary has determined to issue bonds under this subchapter and the amount of investment earnings pledged.

(b)(1)

Thereafter, the secretary shall constantly keep advised of revenues derived from the Arkansas Museum and Cultural Center.

(2)

If it develops that all or any portion of the investment earnings pledged will actually be needed to satisfy the terms of the pledge, the secretary shall promptly notify the board of the amount that will be actually needed each month to provide for the payment of interest, principal, and paying agents' fees and for the maintenance of reserves as specified by the secretary in the resolution or trust indenture authorizing and securing the bonds, which monthly amount is designated the “debt service amount”.

(c)

At the receipt of the notice, the board or the appropriate officer, board, or agency then having jurisdiction over the moneys involved shall set aside the debt service amount of the investment earnings and, subject to first complying with any pledge heretofore or any time hereafter made of investment earnings authorized by the Industrial Development Guaranty Bond Act, §15-4-701 et seq., shall pay the debt service amount directly to the secretary in a bank or banks selected by the secretary and designated the “Arkansas Museum and Cultural Center Bond Guaranty Fund”, also known as the “Center Guaranty Fund”.

(d)(1)

Moneys in the fund shall be used to pay the principal of, interest on, and paying agent's fees in connection with the bonds and to maintain reserves as authorized by this subchapter.

(2)(A)

The payments shall continue until the secretary shall determine that center revenues in the future will be sufficient and shall notify the board to cease paying the debt service amount.

(B)

The payments, within the limits of outstanding pledges made pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter, shall be resumed and discontinued as required.

(e)

The debt service amount and all moneys deposited or to be deposited in the fund are declared to be cash funds, restricted in their use and dedicated and to be used solely as authorized in this subchapter.

(f)

So long as any bonds authorized by this subchapter are outstanding, the authorization made shall not be repealed or diminished without providing an alternate source of funds sufficient to satisfy all revenue pledges made to bonds issued under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, § 5; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1018, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1206; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 5575-5577.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a); and substituted “secretary” for “director” throughout the section.

13-5-317. Refunding bonds.

(a)

The Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism is authorized to issue bonds to refund any bonds issued under the authority of this subchapter.

(b)

All refunding bonds issued under this section shall in all respects be authorized, issued, and secured in the manner provided for other bonds issued under this subchapter and shall have all the attributes of such bonds.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1207.

13-5-318. Tax exemptions.

Bonds issued under this subchapter shall be exempt from all state, county, and municipal taxes.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1208.

13-5-319. Investment by retirement systems.

The board of trustees of any retirement system now existing or created by the General Assembly may invest its funds in bonds issued under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1209.

13-5-320. Audit of records and accounts.

Arkansas Legislative Audit is authorized and directed to audit the records and accounts of the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism and to furnish a copy of the report of that audit to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1210; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5578.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism” and substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “department”.

13-5-321. Employment of personnel.

(a)

The Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism is authorized to employ such full-time or temporary professional, technical, and other consulting services as the secretary shall determine necessary or desirable in assisting the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism to carry out effectively the authority, functions, powers, and duties conferred and imposed upon it by this subchapter.

(b)

However, the salaries of regular employees shall be governed by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §21-5-201 et seq., and by the provisions of the Regular Salary Procedures and Restrictions Act, §21-5-101.

(c)

The Director of the Arkansas Museum and Cultural Center shall be employed by the secretary.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 515, § 11; 1979, No. 832, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1211; Acts 1991, No. 343, § 3(b); 2019, No. 910, § 5579.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for the first occurrence of
“Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism” and substituted “secretary” for the second occurrence, and substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism; and substituted “secretary” for “Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism” in (c).